Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. PUBLIC SAFETY

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL PUBLIC SAFETY

CHAPTER 343. MUNICIPAL PROVISION OF SCHOOL CROSSING GUARDS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 343.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "school crossing guard" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.001, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.224, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 343.002. DESIGNATION OF GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION. The employment, training, equipping, and location of school crossing guards by a political subdivision is a governmental function.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO MUNICIPALITIES WITH A POPULATION OF MORE THAN 1.3 MILLION

Sec. 343.011. APPLICATION. This subchapter applies only to a municipality with a population of more than 1.3 million.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 178, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 343.012. CONTRACT WITH SCHOOL DISTRICTS. (a) The municipality may contract with one or more school districts to provide school crossing guards.

(b) Under a contract, a school district may provide school crossing guard services to an area of the municipality that is not a part of the school district.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 343.013. DEDUCTIONS FROM CHILD SAFETY TRUST FUND. (a) After contracting with a school district, the municipality may deduct from a child safety trust fund established under Chapter 106 the administrative cost of contracting for school crossing guard services and distributing the funds to the school district.

(b) The administrative costs may not exceed 10 percent of the funds available for school crossing guard services.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 343.014. PROVISION OF SCHOOL CROSSING GUARDS. (a) The governing body of the municipality shall determine the number of school crossing guards needed by the municipality and shall provide for the use of school crossing guards to facilitate the safe crossing of streets in the municipality by children going to or leaving a public, parochial, or private elementary or secondary school.

(b) In making the determination of the need for school crossing guards, the municipality shall consider the recommendations of schools and traffic safety experts.

(c) The municipality shall equip school crossing guards that it employs or has under its jurisdiction with all necessary equipment.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 10.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.